Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1429
Assistant funeral director; collaborative agreement; examination required.

To be eligible to enter into a collaborative agreement to act as an assistant funeral director, an individual shall provide evidence of successful completion of an approved jurisprudence examination in Nebraska law.

Laws 2025, LB332, § 6.